District of Columbia statutes.
2-1225.31

Urban renewal plans.

(a)

The Mayor may, with the consent of the Council, modify the urban renewal plans for the following urban renewal areas:

(1)

The Downtown Urban Renewal Area (adopted by the National Capital Planning Commission, established by § 2-1002 (“NCPC”), on January 9, 1969, and approved by the Council on January 28, 1969);

(2)

The Shaw School Urban Renewal Area (adopted by the NCPC on January 9, 1969, and approved by the Council on January 28, 1969); and

(3)

The Fort Lincoln Urban Renewal Area (adopted by the NCPC on May 19, 1972, and approved by the Council on July 26, 1972).

(b)

The Mayor, after referral to the National Capital Planning Commission for a 30-day review period, shall transmit to the Council a proposed resolution to approve a modification authorized by this section. The proposed resolution shall be submitted for a 45-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the proposed resolution within the 45-day review period, the proposed resolution shall be deemed approved.

Mar. 26, 2008, D.C. Law 17-138, § 501, 55 DCR 1689
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, § 310, 56 DCR 1117

History

D.C. Law 17-353, in subsec. (b), substituted “The Mayor, after referral to the National Capital Planning Commission for a 30-day review period,” for “The Mayor”.

Effect of Amendments